North Carolina, session 2025, HB28.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-415.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.1. Possession of firearms, etc., by felon prohibited.
(a) It shall be is unlawful for any person who has been convicted of a felony to purchase,
own, possess, or have in his the person's custody, care, or control any firearm or any weapon of
mass death and destruction as defined in G.S. 14-288.8(c). For the purposes of this section, a
firearm is (i) any weapon, including a starter gun, which will or is designed to or may readily be
converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive, or its frame or receiver, or (ii) any
firearm muffler or firearm silencer. This section does not apply to an antique firearm, as defined
in G.S. 14-409.11.
Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished as subsection is guilty
of a Class G felon.felony.
(a1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section during the commission or
attempted commission of a felony under (i) this Chapter or (ii) Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the
General Statutes is guilty of a Class F felony.
(a2) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section and brandishes a firearm or a
weapon of mass death and destruction during the commission or attempted commission of a
felony under (i) this Chapter or (ii) Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is guilty of a
Class D felony. For the purposes of this subsection, to brandish is to display all or part of the
firearm or weapon of mass death and destruction or otherwise make the presence of the firearm
or weapon of mass death and destruction known to another person.
(a3) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section and discharges a firearm or a
weapon of mass death and destruction during the commission or attempted commission of a
felony under (i) this Chapter or (ii) Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is guilty of a
Class C felony.
(b) Prior convictions which cause disentitlement under this section shall only include:
(1) Felony convictions in North Carolina that occur before, on, or after December
1, 1995; and
(2) Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 487, s. 3, effective December 1, 1995.
(3) Violations of criminal laws of other states or of the United States that occur
before, on, or after December 1, 1995, and that are substantially similar to the
*H28-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
crimes covered in subdivision (1) which are punishable where committed by
imprisonment for a term exceeding one year.
When a person is charged under this section, records of prior convictions of any offense, whether
in the courts of this State, or in the courts of any other state or of the United States, shall be
admissible in evidence for the purpose of proving a violation of this section. The term
"conviction" is defined as a final judgment in any case in which felony punishment, or
imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, as the case may be, is authorized, without regard to
the plea entered or to the sentence imposed. A judgment of a conviction of the defendant or a
plea of guilty by the defendant to such an offense certified to a superior court of this State from
the custodian of records of any state or federal court shall be prima facie evidence of the facts so
certified.
(c) The indictment charging the defendant under the terms of this section shall be separate
from any indictment charging him with other offenses related to or giving rise to a charge under
this section. An indictment which charges the person with violation of this section must set forth
the date that the prior offense was committed, the type of offense and the penalty therefor, and
the date that the defendant was convicted or plead guilty to such offense, the identity of the court
in which the conviction or plea of guilty took place and the verdict and judgment rendered
therein.
(d) This section does not apply to a person who, pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction in
which the conviction occurred, has been pardoned or has had his or her firearms rights restored
if such restoration of rights could also be granted under North Carolina law.
(e) This section does not apply and there is no disentitlement under this section if the
felony conviction is a violation under the laws of North Carolina, another state, or the United
States that pertains to antitrust violations, unfair trade practices, or restraints of trade."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 28-Second Edition